North Dakota, session 69, SB2254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION - FIXED ROUTE CITY
PARATRANSIT TRANSPORTATION GRANTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of
any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$2,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of transportation for the
purpose of providing grants to fixed route city transportation providers for associated paratransit
services, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding appropriated
in this section is one-time funding item.
SECTION 2. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - FIXED ROUTE CITY TRANSPORTATION
SERVICES FUNDING. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study the funding
needs of fixed route city transportation networks. The study must include a review of how the fixed route
transportation networks can address population growth, economic development, workforce needs, and
health care needs. As part of the study, the legislative management shall develop a proposed funding
formula within the department of transportation budget for fixed route city transportation systems. The
legislative management shall report its recommendations, along with any legislation necessary to
implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

S. B. NO. 2254 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2254.
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 4 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 5 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State